Illinois, session 104th, HB1562.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 1-100 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/1-100 new)7    Sec. 1-100. Occupational therapy pilot program for workers 8with disabilities. 9    (a) No later than January 1, 2026, the Department of Human 10Services shall establish and administer a 5-year pilot program 11that integrates an occupational therapy component into the 12State's home-delivered meals program, commonly known as Meals 13on Wheels, authorized under the federal Older Americans Act. 14Under the pilot program, the Department shall award grants 15funded under the Section 14(c) transition program to eligible 16community agencies for the purpose of training and employing 17qualifying workers with disabilities to accompany Meals on 18Wheels drivers on their regular delivery routes and assist in 19the delivery of meals to homebound meal recipients who opt to 20participate in the pilot program. At the option of a 21participating homebound meal recipient, a qualifying worker 22may remain with the recipient for up to 2 hours after meal 23delivery to provide an opportunity for social engagement and   HB1562- 2 -LRB104 05614 KTG 15644 b1interaction. A direct support professional shall travel with 2and supervise all deliveries made by a worker whose disability 3makes the worker less independent.4    Following completion of the 2-hour social engagement 5activity, accommodations shall be made for a Meals on Wheels 6delivery driver to pick-up and transport a qualifying worker 7and any accompanying direct support professional from the 8homebound meal recipient's residence back to the worker's 9personal residence or to a developmental disability facility 10where the worker resides or receives services. To encourage 11and help maintain a social connection between qualifying 12workers and homebound meal recipients, efforts shall be made 13to assign each qualifying worker to at least one participating 14homebound meal recipient for whom the worker will deliver 15meals to on a regular basis.16    (b) To qualify for training and employment under the pilot 17program, an individual must have an intellectual or 18developmental disability and must:19        (1) have held previous employment in a congregate work 20    center or sheltered workshop under a subminimum wage 21    certificate authorized under Section 14(c) of the federal 22    Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938; or23        (2) be aged 22 or older and no longer eligible for 24    services or supports provided through traditional 25    school-based developmental disabilities programs.26    All workers with disabilities selected to participate in   HB1562- 3 -LRB104 05614 KTG 15644 b1the pilot program shall be compensated at a rate level 2consistent with those wage standards applied for workers 3engaged in competitive integrated employment as defined in the 4Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) 5and Section 7 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 6705).7    (c) Community agencies selected to receive grant funding 8under the pilot program must have active or pending subminimum 9wage certificates authorized under Section 14(c) of the 10federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 and meet any other 11eligibility requirements established by the Department by 12rule. 13    (d) To measure the effectiveness of the pilot program, 14beginning one year after the pilot program's implementation 15date the Department shall conduct annual surveys on 16participating homebound meal recipients and workers with 17disabilities to gauge such participants' overall satisfaction 18with the pilot program and to document any other additional 19benefits to program participants. The final survey shall be 20conducted no later than 3 months after the pilot program 21terminates. All surveys shall be posted on the Department's 22official website.  23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 242025.